Maryland, session 2025, HB1343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
7–227.
(a) Except for personal property used in connection with a business, occupation,
or profession, personal property owned by an individual and located at the individual’s
place of residence is not subject to valuation or to property tax.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, personal property is not
subject to valuation or to property tax if the personal property is:
[(1)] (I) owned by an individual;
[(2)] (II) located at the individual’s place of residence; and
– 1 –

Ch. 175 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(3)] (III) used in connection with a family child care home that is
registered under [Title 5, Subtitle 5, Part V of the Family Law Article] TITLE 9.5,
SUBTITLE 3 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(2) IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION, PERSONAL PROPERTY IS NOT SUBJECT TO VALUATION OR TO
PROPERTY TAX IF THE PERSONAL PROPERTY IS:
(I) OWNED BY AN INDIVIDUAL;
(II) LOCATED AT THE INDIVIDUAL’S PLACE OF RESIDENCE; AND
(III) USED IN CONNECTION WITH A LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME THAT IS REGISTERED UNDER TITLE 9.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, personal property is not
subject to valuation or to property tax if:
(i) the personal property is owned by an individual and is used in
connection with a business, occupation, or profession that is located at the individual’s
principal residence; and
(ii) the sum total of the personal property, excluding vehicles exempt
under § 7–230 of this subtitle, had a total original cost of less than $20,000.
(2) If the individual attests to owning a sum total of personal property with
an original cost of less than $20,000, the Department may not:
(i) collect personal property information from the individual; or
(ii) require the individual to submit a personal property tax return.
9–303.
(b) (8) (I) THE GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF
A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY GRANT, BY LAW, A
PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON THAT PORTION OF THE REAL PROPERTY ON WHICH AN
IMPROVEMENT IS SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLETED IF:
1. THE PROPERTY IS OWNED BY A BUSINESS HAVING AT
LEAST 25 EMPLOYEES; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 175
2. THE IMPROVEMENT CONTAINS AN AREA SET ASIDE
AND DEDICATED EXCLUSIVELY FOR A CHILD CARE CENTER THAT IS:
A. REGISTERED AS A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME OR
LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME UNDER TITLE 9.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE; OR
B. LICENSED AS A CHILD CARE CENTER UNDER TITLE
9.5, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE ANNUAL CREDIT MAY NOT EXCEED
$10,000 OR THE AMOUNT OF COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THAT PORTION OF PROPERTY FOR WHICH THE CREDIT WAS
GRANTED, WHICHEVER IS LESS.
(III) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY PROVIDE, BY LAW, FOR:
1. THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE PROPERTY TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(9) (I) THE GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF
A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY GRANT, BY LAW, A
PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON THAT PORTION OF REAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING ANY
IMPROVEMENT, THAT CONTAINS AN AREA SET ASIDE AND DEDICATED EXCLUSIVELY
FOR A DAY CARE CENTER THAT IS:
1. REGISTERED AS A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME OR
LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME UNDER TITLE 9.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE;
2. LICENSED AS A CHILD CARE CENTER UNDER TITLE
9.5, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;
3. LICENSED AS A DAY CARE CENTER FOR THE ELDERLY
UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; OR
– 3 –

Ch. 175 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. LICENSED AS A DAY CARE CENTER FOR ADULTS
UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE ANNUAL CREDIT MAY NOT EXCEED
$10,000 OR THE AMOUNT OF COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THAT PORTION OF PROPERTY FOR WHICH THE CREDIT WAS
GRANTED, WHICHEVER IS LESS.
(III) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY PROVIDE, BY LAW, FOR:
1. THE AMOUNT OF THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH;
2. THE DURATION OF A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
3. ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(IV) A CREDIT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT BE GRANTED
IF THE REAL PROPERTY QUALIFIES FOR A CREDIT UNDER PARAGRAPH (8) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –